New Jersey, session 221, A3355.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   A school district shall include age-appropriate instruction on the events of September 11, 2001 in the curriculum of elementary school, middle school, and high school as part of the districts implementation of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards in Social Studies. b.    The instruction shall provide students with information on: (1)   the historical context of the attack; (2)   a timeline of the day as the events unfolded; (3)   the heroic actions of the police, firefighters, paramedics, and other first responders in the rescue and recovery of the victims, and the heroic sacrifice of the passengers of United Airlines Flight 93; (4)   the outpouring of humanitarian, charitable, and volunteer assistance and support that occurred immediately following the events of that day, and strategies for successfully instilling those traits in daily life; (5)   the global response to terrorism following the events of September 11, 2001 and its effect on living in the post-9/11 world, including the delicate balance between the need for safety and security and respecting civil liberties; and (6)   strategies for teaching tolerance and accepting and embracing people of different religions and cultures. c.     The Commissioner of Education shall provide school districts with sample learning activities and resources designed to promote awareness of the events of September 11, 2001. 2.    Each public school shall annually organize a commemorative event that will enhance student awareness of the events of September 11, 2001. In addition to providing students with information concerning the events of September 11, 2001, the commemorative event shall provide students with age-appropriate opportunities for discussion on conflict resolution, diversity, and tolerance for people of different religions and cultures. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply in the first full school year following the date of enactment.